Wisconsin, session 2025, AB619.
do enact as follows:AB619,11Section 1. 20.370 (7) (cj) of the statutes is created to read:AB619,2,7220.370 (7) (cj) Principal repayment and interest - aviation biofuel 3manufacturing project. From the conservation fund, from the moneys received by 4the department for forestry activities and from any payments made to the 5department under s. 23.44 (3), a sum sufficient to reimburse s. 20.866 (1) (u) for the 6payment of principal and interest costs incurred in financing the grant for the 7aviation biofuel manufacturing project under s. 20.866 (2) (tj).AB619,28Section 2. 20.866 (1) (u) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 915, is amended to read:AB619,3,51020.866 (1) (u) Principal repayment and interest. A sum sufficient from 11moneys appropriated under sub. (2) (zp) and ss. 20.115 (2) (d) and (7) (b) and (s), 1220.190 (1) (c), (d), (i), and (j), 20.225 (1) (c) and (i), 20.245 (1) (e) and (j), 20.250 (1) (c) 13and (e), 20.255 (1) (d), 20.285 (1) (d), (gj), and (je), 20.320 (1) (c) and (t) and (2) (c), 1420.370 (7) (aa), (ad), (ag), (aq), (ar), (at), (au), (bq), (br), (cb), (cc), (cd), (cg), (cj), (cq), 15(cr), (cs), (ct), (ea), (eq), and (er), 20.395 (6) (af), (aq), (ar), and (au), 20.410 (1) (e), 16(ec), and (ko) and (3) (e) and (fm), 20.435 (2) (ee), 20.465 (1) (d), 20.485 (1) (f) and 17(go) and (4) (qm), 20.505 (4) (es), (et), (ha), and (hb) and (5) (c), (g), and (kc), 20.855 18(8) (a), and 20.867 (1) (a) and (b) and (3) (a), (b), (bb), (bc), (bd), (be), (bf), (bg), (bh), 1(bj), (bL), (bm), (bn), (bo), (bq), (br), (bt), (bu), (bv), (bw), (bx), (cb), (cd), (cf), (ch), (cj), 2(cq), (cr), (cs), (cv), (cw), (cx), (cy), (cz), (g), (h), (i), (kd), and (q) for the payment of 3principal, interest, premium due, if any, and payment due, if any, under an 4agreement or ancillary arrangement entered into under s. 18.06 (8) (a) relating to 5any public debt contracted under subchs. I and IV of ch. 18.AB619,36Section 3. 20.866 (2) (tj) of the statutes is created to read:AB619,3,10720.866 (2) (tj) Natural resources; aviation biofuel project. From the capital 8improvement fund, a sum sufficient for the department of natural resources to 9award the grant under s. 23.44. The state may contract public debt in an amount 10not to exceed $150,000,000 for this purpose.AB619,411Section 4. 23.44 of the statutes is created to read:AB619,3,131223.44 Grant for aviation biofuel manufacturing project. (1) In this 13section:AB619,3,1414(a) “Aviation biofuel” means biofuel used as aviation fuel.AB619,3,1515(b) “Aviation biofuel project” has the meaning given in s. 238.394 (1) (b).AB619,3,1716(c) “Biofuel” means liquid or gaseous fuel used in transportation and created 17by synthesizing biomass.AB619,3,1918(d) “Biomass” means biological material derived from wood or woody plant 19materials.AB619,3,2320(2) In fiscal year 2025-26, the department shall obligate $150,000,000 from 21the appropriation under s. 20.866 (2) (tj) to award as a grant to fund the aviation 22biofuel project in the aviation biofuel manufacturing zone described under s. 23238.394. AB619,4,21(3) The department shall award the grant under sub. (2) subject to all of the 2following conditions:AB619,4,123(a) 1. Subject to subd. 2., the grantee shall agree to use any facility 4constructed with the grant awarded under this section for the purpose of aviation 5biofuel manufacturing. Subject to subd. 2., if the facility is used for a purpose other 6than aviation biofuel manufacturing before the latest maturity date of the bonds 7issued to contract public debt under s. 20.866 (2) (tj), the grantee shall pay to the 8department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the amount of the grant 9awarded to the grantee under this section. The building commission shall report 10the latest maturity date of the bonds issued to contract public debt under s. 20.866 11(2) (tj) to the legislative reference bureau and the legislative reference bureau shall 12publish the date in the Wisconsin administrative register under s. 35.93 (2).AB619,4,16132. The use of a facility constructed with the grant awarded under this section 14for the purpose of manufacturing biofuels other than aviation biofuel does not 15violate the requirements under subd. 1. if a majority of the biofuel manufactured at 16all of the facilities constructed with the grant is aviation biofuel.AB619,4,2317(b) The grantee shall agree that, of the biomass it uses to produce biofuel at 18any facility constructed with the grant awarded under this section, 80 percent, as 19measured by aggregate volume over a 5-year period, will be sourced in this state. If 20the grantee produces biofuel at that facility and more than 20 percent of the 21biomass it uses is sourced outside this state, the grantee shall pay to the 22department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the amount of the grant 23awarded to the grantee under this section.AB619,5,624(c) The grantee shall agree in writing to make an investment of not less than 1$1,500,000,000 in economic activities related to manufacturing aviation biofuel in 2this state by the first day of the month beginning 5 years after the effective date of 3this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date]. If the grantee does not make that amount in 4investments in this state by the date specified in this paragraph, the grantee shall 5pay to the department, in a manner prescribed by the department, the amount of 6the grant awarded to the grantee under this section.AB619,5,127(4) The legislature finds and determines that the manufacturing of aviation 8biofuel in this state is essential to maintain and grow the forest products industry 9in this state and to create jobs, and that supporting the growth of the aviation 10biofuel industry is a statewide responsibility of statewide dimension. It is therefore 11in the public interest, and it is the public policy of this state, to assist with the 12construction of an aviation biofuel manufacturing project in this state.AB619,513Section 5. 25.29 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB619,5,191425.29 (1) (a) Except as provided in ss. 25.293 and 25.295, all moneys accruing 15to the state for or in behalf of the department under chs. 26, 27, 28, 29, 169, and 16350, subchs. I and VI of ch. 77 and ss. 23.09 to 23.31, 23.325, 23.33, 23.335, except 17as provided in s. 25.40 (1) (bt), 23.35 to 23.42, 23.44 (3), 23.50 to 23.99, 30.50 to 1830.55, 71.10 (5), 71.30 (10), and 90.21, including grants received from the federal 19government or any of its agencies except as otherwise provided by law.AB619,620Section 6. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2115, is amended to read:AB619,6,32271.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 23(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3v), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), 24(5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), and (10) and not passed through by a 1partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 2that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 3under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB619,74Section 7. 71.07 (3v) of the statutes is created to read:AB619,6,6571.07 (3v) Aviation biofuel manufacturing zone credit. (a) Definitions. 6In this subsection:AB619,6,871. “Aviation biofuel manufacturing zone” means a zone designated under s. 8238.394 (2).AB619,6,1092. “Claimant” means a person who is certified to claim tax benefits under s. 10238.394 (3) and who files a claim under this subsection.AB619,6,1411(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 12subject to the limitations provided in this subsection and s. 238.394, a claimant may 13claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the amount of the 14tax, the amount certified to the claimant under s. 238.394 (3) for the taxable year.AB619,6,2215(c) Limitations. 1. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option 16corporations may not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, 17and the amount of, the credit are based on their payment of the amount described 18under par. (b). A partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation 19shall compute the amount of credit that each of its partners, members, or 20shareholders may claim and shall provide that information to each of them. 21Partners, members of limited liability companies, and shareholders of tax-option 22corporations may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB619,7,2232. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless the claimant 1includes with the claimant’s return a copy of the claimant’s certification for tax 2benefits under s. 238.394 (3).AB619,7,533. No claimant may claim a credit under this subsection if the basis for which 4the credit is claimed is also the basis for which another credit is claimed under this 5subchapter.AB619,7,76(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (g) and (h), as it applies to the credit 7under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB619,7,1182. If a credit computed under this subsection is not entirely offset against the 9taxes otherwise due, the unused balance may be carried forward and credited 10against taxes otherwise due to any following taxable year to the extent the credit is 11not offset by those taxes in the intervening years. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab619 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab619 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB619 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB619 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB619: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting